Hawaii statutes.
[§346E-7] Overpayment; refunds. Upon
application by an operator, if the director determines that any tax, interest,
or penalty has been paid more than once, or has been erroneously or illegally
collected or computed, the tax, interest, or penalty shall be credited by the
director on any taxes then due from the operator under this chapter. The
director shall refund the balance to the operator or the operator's successors,
administrators, executors, or assigns in accordance with section 231-23. As to
all tax payments for which a refund or credit is not authorized under this
section (including, without prejudice to the generality of the foregoing, cases
of unconstitutionality), the remedies provided by appeal or under section 40-35
are exclusive. No credit or refund shall be allowed for any tax imposed by
this chapter, unless a claim for the credit or refund is filed as follows:

(1) If an annual return is timely filed, or is filed
within three years after the date prescribed for filing the annual return, then
the credit or refund shall be claimed within three years after the date the
annual return was filed or the date prescribed for filing the annual return,
whichever is later; and

(2) If an annual return is not filed, or is filed
more than three years after the date prescribed for filing the annual return, a
claim for credit or refund shall be filed within:

(A) Three years after the payment of the tax;
or

(B) Three years after the date prescribed for
the filing of the annual return, whichever is later.

The preceding limitation shall not apply to a credit
or refund pursuant to an appeal, provided for in section 346E-8. [L 1993, c
315, pt of §1; ree L 1994, c 230, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next